California statutes. Civil Code
(5) “Qualified business rental” under a business program established for a business program sponsor by a rental company means the rental of a passenger vehicle under the business program if either:(A) in the 12-month period ending on the date of the rental or in the calendar year immediately preceding the year in which the rental occurs, the rentals under all business programs established by the rental company for the business program sponsor and its affiliates produced gross rental revenues in excess of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) or (B) the rental company in good faith estimates that rentals under all the business programs established by the rental company for the
business program sponsor and its affiliates will produce gross rental revenues in excess of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) in the 12-month period commencing with the date of the rental or in the calendar year in which the rental occurs. The rental company has the burden of establishing by objectively verifiable evidence that the rental was a qualified business rental.

(6) “Quote” means telephonic, in-person, and computer-transmitted quotations.

(b) Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary contained in Section 1939.19 or 1939.23, a rental company may, in connection with the qualified business rental of a passenger vehicle to a business renter of a business program sponsor under the sponsor’s business program, do both of the following:

(1) Separately quote additional charges for the rental if, at the time
the quote is provided, the person receiving the quote is also provided a good faith estimate of the total of all the charges for the entire rental. The estimate may exclude mileage charges and charges for optional items and services that cannot be determined prior to completing the reservation based upon the information provided by the renter.

(2) Separately impose additional charges for the rental, if the rental contract, or another document provided to the business renter at the time and place the rental commences, clearly and conspicuously discloses the total of all the charges for the entire rental, exclusive of charges that cannot be determined at the time the rental commences.

(c) A renter may bring an action against a rental company for the recovery of damages and appropriate equitable relief for a violation of this section. The prevailing party shall be entitled to recover
reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.

(d) Any waiver of any of the provisions of this section shall be void and unenforceable as contrary to public policy.

(e) This section shall not be interpreted to mean that a rental company is not required to comply with the requirements of subdivisions (c) to (h), inclusive, of Section 1939.19.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 183, Sec. 5.   (AB 2051)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1939.22.

A rental company shall send communications to a renter electronically if the renter agrees to that communication in the rental or lease agreement. A rental company shall not deny a rental or lease agreement if the renter chooses not to receive communications electronically. For purposes of this section, “electronically” does not include a cellular telephone.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 344, Sec. 1.   (AB 2620)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

1939.23.

(a) A rental company shall not use, access, or obtain any information relating to the renter’s use of the rental vehicle that was obtained using electronic surveillance technology, except in the following circumstances:

(1) (A) When the equipment is used by the rental company only for the purpose of locating a stolen, abandoned, or missing rental vehicle after one of the following:

(i) The renter or law enforcement has informed the rental company that the vehicle is missing or has been stolen or abandoned.

(ii) If the rental vehicle has
 not been returned following 24 hours after the contracted return date or by 24 hours following the end of an extension of that return date, the rental company may activate electronic surveillance technology. The rental company shall provide notice of activation of the electronic surveillance technology 24 hours before activation, by telephone and electronically pursuant to Section 1939.22, unless the renter has not provided a telephone number or the renter has not agreed to electronic communication pursuant to Section 1939.22. The rental or lease agreement shall advise the renter that electronic surveillance technology may be activated if the rental vehicle has not been returned within 24 hours after the contracted return date or extension of the return date. The renter shall acknowledge this advisement in the rental or lease agreement by initials. The advisement shall also be made orally to
 the renter at the time of executing the rental or lease agreement if the transaction is completed in person or by telephone. The advisements are not required to be made to members of the rental company’s membership program executing a rental or lease agreement. However, a renter shall be given those advisements upon enrolling in the rental company’s membership program.

(iii) Notwithstanding clause (ii), if the rental vehicle has not been returned following one week after the contracted return date or by one week following the end of an extension of that return date.

(iv) The rental company discovers the rental vehicle has been stolen or abandoned, and, if stolen, the rental company shall report the vehicle stolen to law enforcement by filing a stolen vehicle report, unless law
 enforcement has already informed the rental company that the vehicle is missing or has been stolen or abandoned.

(v) The rental vehicle is the subject of an AMBER Alert issued pursuant to Section 8594 of the Government Code. If the rental company uses the equipment in connection with this provision relating to an AMBER Alert, the rental company shall notify law enforcement that one of the rental company’s vehicles is the subject of an AMBER Alert upon becoming aware of the situation, unless law enforcement has already informed the rental company that the vehicle was the subject of an AMBER Alert.

(B) If electronic surveillance technology is activated pursuant to subparagraph (A), a rental company shall maintain a record, in either electronic or written form, of information
 relevant to the activation of that technology. That information shall include the rental agreement, including the return date, and the date and time the electronic surveillance technology was activated. The record shall also include, if relevant, a record of written or other communication with the renter, including communications regarding extensions of the rental, police reports, or other written
 communication with law enforcement officials. The record shall be maintained for a period of at least 12 months from the time the record is created and shall be made available upon the renter’s request. The rental company shall maintain and furnish explanatory codes necessary to read the record. A rental company shall not be required to maintain a record if electronic surveillance technology is activated to recover a rental vehicle that is stolen or missing at a time other than during a rental period.

(2) In response to a specific request from law enforcement pursuant to a subpoena or search warrant.

(3) The rental company uses
 geofence technology to detect the movement of a rental vehicle in either of the following circumstances:

(A) The rental vehicle is moved outside of the country, if travel outside of the country is not authorized by the rental agreement.

(B) The rental vehicle is moved into an impound or tow yard. The rental company shall notify the renter that the vehicle has been detected within an impound or tow yard. If the vehicle remains within the perimeter of the impound or tow yard for 24 hours after the notification, the
 vehicle shall be deemed abandoned by the renter.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not prohibit a rental company from equipping rental vehicles with any of the following:

(1) GPS-based technology that provides navigation assistance to the occupants of the rental vehicle, if the rental company does not use, access, or obtain information relating to the renter’s use of the rental vehicle that was obtained using that technology, except for the purposes of discovering or repairing a defect in the technology and the information may then be used only for that purpose.

(2) Electronic surveillance technology that allows for the remote locking or unlocking of the vehicle at the request of the renter, if the rental company does not
 use, access, or obtain information relating to the renter’s use of the rental vehicle that was obtained using that technology, except as necessary to lock or unlock the vehicle.

(3) Electronic surveillance technology that allows the company to provide roadside assistance, such as towing, flat tire, or fuel services, at the request of the renter, if the rental company does not use, access, or obtain information relating to the renter’s use of the rental vehicle that was obtained using that technology except as necessary to provide the requested roadside assistance.

(c) Subdivision (a) does not prohibit a rental company from obtaining, accessing, or using information from electronic surveillance technology for the sole purpose of determining the date and time the vehicle departs
 from and is returned to the rental company, and the total mileage driven and the vehicle fuel level of the returned vehicle. The information obtained or accessed from this electronic surveillance technology shall only be used for the purpose described in this subdivision.

(d) A rental company shall not use electronic surveillance technology to track a renter in order to impose fines or surcharges relating to the renter’s use of the rental vehicle.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 449, Sec. 2.   (AB 1197)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1939.25.

A renter may bring an action against a rental company for the recovery of damages and appropriate equitable relief for a violation of this chapter, except for Sections 1939.21, 1939.35, and 1939.37. The prevailing party shall be entitled to recover reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 183, Sec. 5.   (AB 2051)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1939.27.

A rental company that brings an action against a renter for loss due to theft of the vehicle shall bring the action in the county in which the renter resides or, if the renter is not a resident of this state, in the jurisdiction in which the renter resides.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 183, Sec. 5.   (AB 2051)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1939.29.

A waiver of any of the provisions of this chapter, except for Sections 1939.21, 1939.35, and 1939.37, shall be void and unenforceable as contrary to public policy.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 183, Sec. 5.   (AB 2051)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1939.31.

(a) A rental company’s disclosure requirements shall be satisfied for renters who are enrolled in the rental company’s membership program if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) Prior to the enrollee’s first rental as a participant in the program, the renter receives, in writing, the following:

(A) All of the disclosures required by paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 1939.09, including the terms and conditions of the rental agreement then in effect.

(B) An internet website address, as well as a contact number or address, where the enrollee can learn of
 changes to the rental agreement or to the laws of this state governing rental agreements since the effective date of the rental company’s most recent restatement of the rental agreement and distribution of that restatement to its members.

(2) At the commencement of each rental period, the renter is provided, on the rental record or the folder in which it is inserted, with a printed notice stating that the renter had either previously selected or declined an optional damage waiver and that the renter has the right to change preferences.

(b) This section does not relieve the rental company from the disclosures required to be made within the text of a contract or holder in which the contract is placed; in or on an advertisement containing a rental rate; or in a telephonic,
 in-person, or computer-transmitted quotation or reservation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 415, Sec. 3.   (AB 901)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1939.33.

(a) When a rental company enters into a rental agreement in the state for the rental of a vehicle to any renter who is not a resident of this country and, as part of, or associated with, the rental agreement, the renter purchases liability insurance, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 1758.85 of the Insurance Code, from the rental company in its capacity as a rental vehicle agent for an authorized insurer, the rental company shall be authorized to accept,
and, if served as set forth in this section, shall accept, service of a summons and complaint and any other required documents against the foreign renter for any accident or collision resulting from the operation of the rental vehicle within the state during the rental period. If the rental company has a registered agent for service of process on file with the Secretary of State, process shall be served on the rental company’s registered agent, either by first-class mail, return receipt requested, or by personal service.

(b) Within 30 days of acceptance of service of process, the rental company shall provide a copy of the summons and complaint and any other required documents served in accordance with this section to the foreign renter by first-class mail, return receipt requested.

(c) Any plaintiff, or his or her representative, who elects to serve the foreign renter by
delivering a copy of the summons and complaint and any other required documents to the rental company pursuant to subdivision (a) shall agree to limit his or her recovery against the foreign renter and the rental company to the limits of the protection extended by the liability insurance.

(d) Notwithstanding the requirements of Sections 17450 to 17456, inclusive, of the Vehicle Code, service of process in compliance with subdivision (a) shall be deemed a valid and effective service.

(e) Notwithstanding any other law, the requirement that the rental company accept service of process pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not create any duty, obligation, or agency relationship other than that provided in subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 183, Sec. 5.   (AB 2051)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1939.35.

(a) (1) A rental company shall provide a renter of a 15-passenger van with a copy of the United States Department of Transportation, National Highway Traffic Safety Administration’s consumer advisory for 15-passenger vans titled “Reducing the Risk of Rollover Crashes” or, if that advisory is updated, a copy of the updated advisory. The renter shall acknowledge receipt of that copy by signing an acknowledgment of receipt on the rental
agreement or on an attached form.

(2) If the rental of that 15-passenger van is for a business purpose or use, the rental company shall also provide on the document described in paragraph (1) that only an employee with the proper licensing may drive that vehicle. The renter shall acknowledge the receipt thereof in the same manner as described in paragraph (1).

(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), for purposes of this section, a “15-passenger van” means any van manufactured to accommodate 15 passengers, including the driver, regardless of whether that van has been altered to accommodate fewer than 15 passengers.

(2) For purposes of this section, a “15-passenger van” does not mean a 15-passenger van with dual rear wheels that has a gross weight rating equal to, or greater than, 11,500
pounds.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 183, Sec. 5.   (AB 2051)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1939.37.

A rental company is not subject to the requirements of Section 14608 of the Vehicle Code if the rental is subject to the terms of a membership agreement that allows the renter to gain physical access to a vehicle without a key through use of a code, key card, or by other means that allow the vehicle to be accessed at a remote location, or at a business location of the rental company outside of that location’s regular hours of operation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 183, Sec. 5.   (AB 2051)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1939.38.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, a commercial airport facility may regulate access to an airport and require any person or entity described in subdivision (m) of Section 1939.01 to collect a customer facility charge pursuant to Section 50474.21 of the Government Code.

(b) (1) Before facilitating the sharing or renting of vehicles, any program, person, or entity described in subdivision (m) of Section 1939.01 shall obtain a permit or other written authorization from the airport operator that sets forth the terms, standards, regulations, procedures, fees, and access requirements for the activity.

(2) For purposes of paragraph (1), “facilitating the sharing or
 renting of vehicles” includes listing, publishing, or advertising vehicles or motor vehicles parked on airport property or at airport facilities.

(c) This section shall not affect the authority of any political subdivision or the state to do any of the following:

(1) Regulate access to an airport it owns or operates.

(2) Enter into written agreements.

(3) Set access fees or permit requirements.

(4) Regulate existing airport access permits granted by an airport to personal vehicle sharing programs.

(d) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2024.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 547, Sec. 2.   (AB 893)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative July 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1939.39.

On and after July 1, 2024, a personal vehicle sharing program shall not allow a vehicle to be placed on a digital network or software application of the personal vehicle sharing program for the purpose of making the vehicle available for rental through the personal vehicle sharing program unless the certification described in subdivision (a) or (b), as applicable, is fulfilled:

(a) If the request is to list a motor vehicle that was purchased in California, and that motor vehicle would first be made available for sharing on or after July 1, 2024, certification that one of the following occurred:

(1) All sales and use taxes were paid on the purchase price of the motor vehicle.

(2) The purchaser elected to have sales and use taxes collected on receipts from renting the motor vehicle in lieu of paying applicable taxes on the purchase price of the motor vehicle.

(3) The purchase of the motor vehicle was not subject to taxation due to an exemption available under law.

(b) If the request is to list a motor vehicle that was not purchased in California, and that motor vehicle would first be made available for sharing on or after July 1, 2024, certification that one of the following occurred:

(1) Applicable taxes were paid on the purchase price of the vehicle.

(2) Applicable taxes were not paid on the purchase price of the
 vehicle.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 547, Sec. 3.   (AB 893)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Hiring of Real Property [1940. - 1954.071.]

1940.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), this chapter shall apply to all persons who hire dwelling units located within this state including tenants, lessees, boarders, lodgers, and others, however denominated.

(b) The term “persons who hire” shall not include a person who maintains either of the following:

(1) Transient occupancy in a hotel, motel, residence club, or other facility when the transient
occupancy is or would be subject to tax under Section 7280 of the Revenue and Taxation Code. The term “persons who hire” shall not include a person to whom this paragraph pertains if the person has not made valid payment for all room and other related charges owing as of the last day on which his or her occupancy is or would be subject to tax under Section 7280 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(2) Occupancy at a hotel or motel where the innkeeper retains a right of access to and control of the dwelling unit and the hotel or motel provides or offers all of the following services to all of the residents:

(A) Facilities for the safeguarding of personal property pursuant to Section 1860.

(B) Central telephone service subject to tariffs covering the same filed with the California Public Utilities Commission.

(C) Maid, mail, and room services.

(D) Occupancy for periods of less than seven days.

(E) Food service provided by a food establishment, as defined in Section 113780 of the Health and Safety Code, located on or adjacent to the premises of the hotel or motel and owned or operated by the innkeeper or owned or operated by a person or entity pursuant to a lease or similar relationship with the innkeeper or person or entity affiliated with the innkeeper.

(c) “Dwelling unit” means a structure or the part of a structure that is used as a home, residence, or sleeping place by one person who maintains a household or by two or more persons who maintain a common household.

(d) Nothing in this section
shall be construed to limit the application of any provision of this chapter to tenancy in a dwelling unit unless the provision is so limited by its specific terms.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1023, Sec. 28.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

1940.05.

For purposes of this chapter, “immigration or citizenship status” includes a perception that the person has a particular immigration status or citizenship status, or that the person is associated with a person who has, or is perceived to have, a particular immigration status or citizenship status.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 489, Sec. 2.   (AB 291)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1940.1.

(a) No person may require an occupant of a residential hotel, as defined in Section 50519 of the Health and Safety Code, to move, or to check out and reregister, before the expiration of 30 days occupancy if a purpose is to have that occupant maintain transient occupancy status pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 1940. Evidence that an occupant was required to check out and reregister shall create a rebuttable presumption, which shall affect solely the burden of producing evidence, of the purpose referred to in this
subdivision.

(b) In addition to any remedies provided by local ordinance, any violation of subdivision (a) is punishable by a civil penalty of five hundred dollars ($500). In any action brought pursuant to this section, the prevailing party shall be entitled to reasonable attorney’s fees.

(c) Nothing in this section shall prevent a local governing body from establishing inspection authority or reporting or recordkeeping requirements to ensure compliance with this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 950, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

1940.2.

(a) It is unlawful for a landlord to do any of the following for the purpose of influencing a tenant to vacate a dwelling:

(1) Engage in conduct that violates subdivision (a) of Section 484 of the Penal Code.

(2) Engage in conduct that violates Section 518 of the Penal Code.

(3) Use, or threaten to use, force, willful threats, or menacing conduct constituting a course of conduct that interferes with the tenant’s quiet enjoyment of the premises in violation of Section 1927 that would create an apprehension of harm in a reasonable person. Nothing in this paragraph requires a tenant to be actually or constructively evicted in order to obtain relief.

(4) Commit a significant and intentional violation of Section 1954.

(5) Threaten to disclose information regarding or relating to the immigration or citizenship status of a tenant, occupant, or other person known to the landlord to be associated with a tenant or occupant. This paragraph does not require a tenant to be actually or constructively evicted in order to obtain relief.

(b) A
tenant who prevails in a civil action, including an action in small claims court, to enforce his or her rights under this section is entitled to a civil penalty in an amount not to exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000) for each violation.

(c) An oral or written warning notice, given in good faith, regarding conduct by a tenant, occupant, or guest that violates, may violate, or violated the applicable rental agreement, rules, regulations, lease, or laws, is not a violation of this section. An oral or written explanation of the rental agreement, rules, regulations, lease, or laws given in the normal course of business is not a violation of this section.

(d) This section does not enlarge or diminish a landlord’s right to terminate a tenancy pursuant to existing state or local law; nor does this section enlarge or diminish any ability of local government to regulate or enforce a
prohibition against a landlord’s harassment of a tenant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 489, Sec. 3.   (AB 291)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1940.3.

(a) A public entity shall not, by ordinance, regulation, policy, or administrative action implementing any ordinance, regulation, policy, or administrative action, compel a landlord or any agent of the landlord to make any inquiry, compile, disclose, report, or provide any information, prohibit offering or continuing to offer, accommodations in the property for rent or lease, or otherwise take any action regarding
or based on the immigration or citizenship status of a tenant, prospective tenant, occupant, or prospective occupant of residential rental property.

(b) A landlord, or any agent of the landlord, shall not do any of the following:

(1) Make any inquiry regarding or based on the immigration or citizenship status of a tenant, prospective tenant, occupant, or prospective occupant of residential rental property.

(2) Require that any tenant, prospective tenant, occupant, or prospective occupant of the rental property disclose or make any statement, representation, or certification concerning his or her immigration or citizenship status.

(3) Disclose to any person or entity information regarding or relating to the immigration or citizenship status of any
tenant, prospective tenant, occupant, or prospective occupant of the rental property for the purpose of, or with the intent of, harassing or intimidating a tenant, prospective tenant, occupant, or prospective occupant, retaliating against a tenant or occupant for the exercise of his or her rights, influencing a tenant or occupant to vacate a dwelling, or recovering possession of the dwelling. 

(c) This section does not prohibit a landlord from doing any of the following:

(1) Complying with any legal obligation under federal law, including, but not limited to, any legal obligation under any federal government program that provides for rent limitations or rental assistance to a qualified tenant, or a subpoena, warrant, or other order issued by a court.

(2) Requesting information or documentation necessary to determine
or verify the financial qualifications of a prospective tenant, or to determine or verify the identity of a prospective tenant or prospective occupant.

(d) For purposes of this section, both of the following shall apply:

(1) “Public entity” includes the state, a city, county, city and county, district, public authority, public agency, and any other political subdivision or public corporation in the state.

(2) “State” includes any state office, department, division, bureau, board, or commission and the Trustees of the California State University and the California State University.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 490, Sec. 1.5.   (AB 299)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1940.35.

(a) It is unlawful for a landlord to disclose to any immigration authority, law enforcement agency, or local, state, or federal agency information regarding or relating to the immigration or citizenship status of any tenant, occupant, or other person known to the landlord to be associated with a tenant or occupant, for the purpose of, or with the intent of, harassing or intimidating a tenant or occupant, retaliating against a tenant or occupant for the exercise of his or her
rights, influencing a tenant or occupant to vacate a dwelling, or recovering possession of the dwelling, irrespective of whether the tenant or occupant currently resides in the dwelling.

(b) If a court of applicable jurisdiction finds a violation of this section in a proceeding initiated by a party or upon a motion of the court, the court shall do all of the following:

(1) For each person whose status was so disclosed, order the landlord to pay statutory damages in an amount to be determined in the court’s discretion that is between 6 and 12 times the monthly rent charged for the dwelling in which the tenant or occupant resides or resided.

(2) Issue injunctive relief to prevent the landlord from engaging in similar conduct with respect to other tenants, occupants, and persons known to the landlord to be associated
with the tenants or occupants.

(3) Notify the district attorney of the county in which the real property for hire is located of a potential violation of Section 519 of the Penal Code.

(c) A landlord is not in violation of this section if he or she is complying with any legal obligation under federal law, or subpoena, warrant, or order issued by a court.

(d) In making findings in a proceeding under this section, a court may take judicial notice under subdivision (d) of Section 452 of the Evidence Code of the proceedings and records of any federal removal, inadmissibility, or deportation proceeding.

(e) A court shall award to the prevailing party in an action under this section attorney’s fees and costs.

(f) The remedies provided by this section shall be in addition to any other remedies provided by statutory or decisional law.

(g) Any waiver of a right under this section by a tenant, occupant, or person known to the landlord to be associated with a tenant or occupant shall be void as a matter of public policy.

(h) An action for injunctive relief pursuant to this section may be brought by a nonprofit organization exempt from federal income taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended. That organization shall be considered a party for purposes of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 489, Sec. 5.   (AB 291)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1940.4.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c), a landlord shall not prohibit a tenant from posting or displaying political signs relating to any of the following:

(1) An election or legislative vote, including an election of a candidate to public office.

(2) The initiative, referendum, or recall process.

(3) Issues that are before a public commission, public board, or elected local body for a vote.

(b) Political signs may be posted or displayed in the window or on the door of the premises leased by the tenant in a multifamily dwelling, or from the yard, window, door, balcony, or outside wall of the premises leased by a tenant of a single-family dwelling.

(c) A landlord may prohibit a tenant from posting or displaying political signs in the following circumstances:

(1) The political sign is more than six square feet in size.

(2) The posting or displaying would violate a local, state, or federal law.

(3) The posting or displaying
would violate a lawful provision in a common interest development governing a document that satisfies the criteria of Section 1353.6.

(d) A tenant shall post and remove political signs in compliance with the time limits set by the ordinance for the jurisdiction where the premises are located. A tenant shall be solely responsible for any violation of a local ordinance. If no local ordinance exists or if the local ordinance does not include a time limit for posting and removing political signs on private property, the landlord may establish a reasonable time period for the posting and removal of political signs. A reasonable time period for this purpose shall begin at least 90 days prior to the date of the election or vote to which the sign relates and end at least 15 days following the date of the election or vote.

(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any changes in the
terms of a tenancy that are made to implement the provisions of this section and are noticed pursuant to Section 827 shall not be deemed to cause a diminution in housing services, and may be enforced in accordance with Section 1161 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 383, Sec. 1.   (SB 337)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1940.41.

(a) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Personal micromobility device” means a device with both of the following characteristics:

(A) It is powered by the physical exertion of the rider or an electric motor.

(B) It is designed to transport one individual or one adult accompanied by up to three minors.

(2) “Secure, long-term storage” means a location with all of the following characteristics:

(A) Access is limited to residents of
 the same housing complex.

(B) It is located on the premises.

(C) It is reasonably protected against precipitation.

(D) It has a minimum of one standard electrical connection for each personal micromobility device that will be stored and recharged in that location.

(E) Tenants are not charged for its use.

(b) A landlord shall not prohibit a tenant from either of the following:

(1) Owning personal micromobility devices. 

(2) (A) Storing and recharging up to one personal micromobility device in their dwelling unit for each person occupying the unit if the personal micromobility device meets one of the following:

(i) Is not powered by an electric motor.

(ii) Complies with the following safety standards:

(I) For e-bikes, UL 2849, the Standard for Electrical Systems for E-bikes, as recognized by the United States Consumer Product Safety Commission, or EN 15194, the European Standard for electrically powered assisted cycles (EPAC Bicycles). 

(II) For e-scooters, UL 2272, the Standard for Electrical Systems for Personal E-Mobility Devices, as recognized by the United States Consumer Product Safety Commission, or EN 17128, the European Standard for personal light electric vehicles (PLEV).

(iii) Is insured by the tenant under an insurance policy covering storage of the device within the tenant’s dwelling unit. The owner may prohibit the tenant from charging a device in the unit if the device does not meet the standards in subclauses (I) and (II) of clause (ii).

(B) Subparagraph (A) does not apply if the landlord provides the tenant secure, long-term storage for the tenant’s personal micromobility devices.

(C) Subparagraphs (A) and (B) do not apply to circumstances in which an occupant of the unit requires the use of a personal micromobility device as an accommodation for a disability.

(c) This section does not require a landlord to modify or approve a tenant’s request to modify a rental dwelling unit for the purpose of storing a micromobility device inside of the dwelling unit.

(d) This section does not prohibit a landlord from doing any of the following:

(1) (A) Prohibiting repair or maintenance on batteries and motors of personal micromobility devices within a dwelling unit.

(B) Subparagraph (A) does not prohibit a tenant from changing a flat tire or adjusting the brakes on a personal micromobility device within the unit.

(2) Requiring a tenant to store a personal micromobility device in compliance with applicable fire code.

(3) Requiring a tenant to store a personal micromobility device in compliance with the
 Office of State Fire Marshal Information Bulletin 23-003 regarding lithium-ion battery safety, issued April 3, 2023, or any updated guidance issued by the Office of the State Fire Marshal regarding lithium-ion battery safety, if such bulletin or guidance is provided to the tenant by the landlord.

(e) This section does not limit the rights and remedies available to disabled persons under federal or state law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 630, Sec. 1.   (SB 712)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1940.45.

(a) Except as otherwise provided by this section, a property owner shall not enforce or adopt a restrictive covenant or any other restriction that prohibits one or more religious items from being displayed or affixed on any entry door or entry door frame of a dwelling.

(b) To the extent permitted by Article 1, Section 4, of the California Constitution and the First Amendment to the United States Constitution, this section does not prohibit the enforcement or adoption of a restrictive covenant or
 other restriction prohibiting the display or affixing of a religious item on any entry door or entry door frame to a dwelling that:

(1) Threatens the public health or safety.

(2) Hinders the opening or closing of any entry door.

(3) Violates any federal, state, or local law.

(4) Contains graphics, language or any display that is obscene or otherwise illegal.

(5) Individually or in combination with any other religious item displayed or affixed on any entry door or door frame that has a total size greater than 36 by 12
 square inches, provided it does not exceed the size of the door.

(c) As used in this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Property owner” means all of the following:

(A) An association, as that term is defined in Section 4080.

(B) A board, as that term is defined in Section 4085.

(C) A member, as that term is defined in Section
 4160.

(D) A landlord, as that term is defined in Section 1940.8.5.

(E) A sublessor.

(2) “Religious item” means an item displayed because of sincerely held religious beliefs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 154, Sec. 1.   (SB 652)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1940.5.

An owner or an owner’s agent shall not refuse to rent a dwelling unit in a structure which received its valid certificate of occupancy after January 1, 1973, to an otherwise qualified prospective tenant or refuse to continue to rent to an existing tenant solely on the basis of that tenant’s possession of a waterbed or other bedding with liquid filling material where all of the following requirements and conditions are met:

(a) A tenant or prospective tenant furnishes to the owner, prior to